Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4672.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.096, is amended to read: 245.096 CHANGES TO GRANT PROGRAMS. Prior to implementing any deleted text begin substantialdeleted text end changes to a grant funding formula disbursed through allocations administered by the commissioner, the commissioner must provide a report on the nature of the changes, the effect the changes will have, whether any funding will change, and other relevant information, to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services. The report must be provided prior to the start of a regular session, and the proposed changes cannot be implemented until after the adjournment of that regular session. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245.4661, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Services and programs. deleted text begin (a) The following three distinct grant programs are funded under this section: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) mental health crisis services; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) housing with supports for adults with serious mental illness; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) projects for assistance in transitioning from homelessness (PATH program). deleted text end deleted text begin (b) In addition,deleted text end The following are eligible for grant fundsnew text begin under this sectionnew text end : (1) community education and prevention; (2) client outreach; (3) early identification and intervention; deleted text begin (4) adult outpatient diagnostic assessment and psychological testing; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) peer support services; deleted text end deleted text begin (6) community support program services (CSP); deleted text end deleted text begin (7) adult residential crisis stabilization; deleted text end deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (4) new text end supported employment; deleted text begin (9) assertive community treatment (ACT); deleted text end deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end housing subsidies; deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end basic living, social skills, and community intervention; deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end emergency response services; deleted text begin (13) adult outpatient psychotherapy; deleted text end deleted text begin (14) adult outpatient medication management; deleted text end deleted text begin (15)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end adult mobile crisis services, including the purchase and renovation of vehicles by mobile crisis teams in order to provide protected transport under section 256B.0625, subdivision 17, paragraph (l), clause (6); deleted text begin (16)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end adult day treatment; deleted text begin (17)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end partial hospitalization;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (18) adult residential treatment; deleted text end deleted text begin (19) adult mental health targeted case management; and deleted text end deleted text begin (20)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end transportation. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245.4889, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment and authority. (a) The commissioner is authorized to make grants from available appropriations to assist: (1) counties; (2) deleted text begin Indian tribesdeleted text end new text begin Minnesota's Tribal Nationsnew text end ; (3) children's collaboratives under section 142D.15 or 245.493; or (4) mental health service providers. (b) The following services are eligible for grants under this section: deleted text begin (1) services to children with mental illness as defined in section 245.4871, subdivision 15, and their families; deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1) new text end transition services under section 245.4875, subdivision 8, for young adults under age 21 and their families; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end respite care services for children with mental illness or serious mental illness who are at risk of residential treatment or hospitalization; who are already in residential treatment or therapeutic foster care or in family foster settings as defined in chapter 142B and at risk of change in foster care or placement in a residential facility or other higher level of care; who have utilized crisis services or emergency room services; or who have experienced a loss of in-home staffing support. Allowable activities and expenses for respite care services are defined under subdivision 4. A child is not required to have case management services to receive respite care services. Counties must work to provide access to regularly scheduled respite care; deleted text begin (4) children's mental health crisis services; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) child-, youth-, and family-specific mobile response and stabilization services models; deleted text end deleted text begin (6) mental health services for people from cultural and ethnic minorities, including supervision of clinical trainees who are Black, indigenous, or people of color; deleted text end deleted text begin (7) children's mental health screening and follow-up diagnostic assessment and treatment; deleted text end deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end services to promote and develop the capacity of providers to use evidence-based practices in providing children's mental health services; deleted text begin (9) school-linked mental health services under section 245.4901; deleted text end deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end building evidence-based mental health intervention capacity for children birth to age five; deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end suicide prevention and counseling services that use text messaging statewide; deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end mental health first aid training; deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end training for parents, collaborative partners, and mental health providers on the impact of adverse childhood experiences and trauma and development of an interactive website to share information and strategies to promote resilience and prevent trauma; deleted text begin (14)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end transition age services to develop or expand mental health treatment and supports for adolescents and young adults 26 years of age or younger; deleted text begin (15)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end early childhood mental health consultation; deleted text begin (16) evidence-based interventions for youth at risk of developing or experiencing a first episode of psychosis, and a public awareness campaign on the signs and symptoms of psychosis; deleted text end deleted text begin (17)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end psychiatric consultation for primary care practitioners; deleted text begin (18)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end providers to begin operations and meet program requirements when establishing a new children's mental health program. These may be start-up grants; and deleted text begin (19)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end evidence-based interventions for youth and young adults at risk of developing or experiencing an early episode of bipolar disorder. (c) Services under paragraph (b) must be designed to help each child to function and remain with the child's family in the community and delivered consistent with the child's treatment plan. Transition services to eligible young adults under this paragraph must be designed to foster independent living in the community. (d) As a condition of receiving grant funds, a grantee shall obtain all available third-party reimbursement sources, if applicable. (e) The commissioner may establish and design a pilot program to expand the mobile response and stabilization services model for children, youth, and families. The commissioner may use grant funding to consult with a qualified expert entity to assist in the formulation of measurable outcomes and explore and position the state to submit a Medicaid state plan amendment to scale the model statewide. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.73, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Rules; reports. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end promulgate an emergency and permanent rule to govern grant applications, approval of applications, allocation of grants, and maintenance of service and financial records by grant recipients. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end specify requirements for reports, including quarterly fiscal reports, according to section 256.01, subdivision 2, paragraph (o). The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end require collection of data for compliance, monitoring and evaluation purposes and shall require periodic reports to demonstrate the effectiveness of the services in helping deleted text begin adult mentally ill personsdeleted text end new text begin adults with mental illnessnew text end remain and function in their own communities. deleted text begin As a part of the report required by section 245.461, the commissioner shall report to the legislature as to the effectiveness of this program and recommendations regarding continued funding.deleted text end new text begin The commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over mental health on the program. The report must include information on the effectiveness of the program based on data collected from grant recipients and recommendations on continued funding.new text end